South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5684.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 7-11-15 or 7-11-210, and for 2026 only, the dates for filing for all candidates seeking nomination by a political party primary or a political party convention for one of the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives is between noon on June eighth and noon on June fifteenth. (B) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7-13-40, and for 2026 only, a special primary must be held on the second Tuesday in August for the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives to be voted on in the November 3, 2026, general election. Written certification of the names of all candidates for the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives to be placed on the special primary ballots must be made by the political party chairman, vice chairman, or secretary to the State Election Commission no later than noon on June 19, 2026. (C) A special runoff primary, if necessary, must be held on August 25, 2026. (D) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7-13-350, written certification of the names of the nominees for the seven seats in the U.S. House of Representatives to be placed on the November 3, 2026, general election ballot must be made by the political party chairman, vice chairman, or secretary to the State Election Commission no later than noon on September 8, 2026. (E) Only votes cast in the special primary and subsequent runoff, if necessary, for candidates for U.S. House may be counted for purposes of determining the names of nominees to appear on the November 3, 2026, general election ballots. No votes cast in the June 9, 2026, statewide primary for candidates for U.S. House may be counted for these purposes. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----